Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Chapter 15. Vermont Employment Service

§ 1201.
Acceptance by State.

The State of Vermont hereby accepts the provisions of the Act of Congress, approved June 6, 1933, entitled “An act to provide for the establishment of a national employment system and for cooperation with the states in the promotion of such system, and for other purposes.”

§ 1202.
Commissioner of Labor as agent.

The Commissioner of Labor is hereby designated and constituted the agent of the State of Vermont for the purposes of the Act, with full power to cooperate with all authorities of the United States having powers or duties under the Act and to do and perform all things necessary to secure to the State of Vermont the benefits of the Act in the promotion and maintenance of a system of public employment offices.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1203.
Rules and regulations.

There is hereby created, under the direction of the Commissioner of Labor, a division to be known as the Vermont Employment Service Division, responsible for administering a system of public employment offices for the purpose of assisting employers to secure employees and workers to secure employment.
The Commissioner is authorized and directed to establish such offices in such parts of the State as he or she deems necessary and to prescribe rules and regulations not inconsistent with any of the provisions of this chapter.
The Commissioner shall appoint the director, assistants, and other employees of the Vermont Employment Service Division in accordance with the regulations prescribed by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Labor.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

1961, No. 210

, § 15, eff. July 11, 1961;

1981, No. 66

, § 5(b), eff. May 1, 1981;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1204.
Receipt of funds.

The State Treasurer is hereby authorized to receive, on behalf of this State, all funds granted to it under authority of the Act.

§ 1205.
Contractual special services.

The Commissioner of Labor may enter into agreements to provide customized or special services that are beyond basic services required by federal statute, provided that such services do not interfere with the Department’s statutory purposes and programs. The Department may charge for services provided under this section. Charges collected under this section shall be credited to separate special funds for each type of service agreement, and shall be available to the Department to offset the costs of each type of service.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 65; amended

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 1206.
Termination.

This chapter may be terminated by the Governor at any time, upon notice to the U.S. Department of Labor, when in his or her judgment the need for the same no longer exists.
However, such notice of termination shall not be effective until the close of the U.S. fiscal year in which the notice is given.